Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Lease of Real Property
56.8167.
Per diem of members who are not state employees — Reimbursement for costs incurred.

Selection committee members who are not state employees shall receive a salary of one hundred dollars ($100) per day for those days authorized by the selection committee for selection committee activities.

Selection committee members who are state employees shall not receive a salary for their time spent on selection committee activities, and the state government salaries of these committee members shall not be reduced due to time spent away from other state government activities.

All selection committee members shall be reimbursed for costs necessarily incurred in carrying out their duties. All reimbursements shall be authorized by the selection committee.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall pay all costs generated under this section by the selection committee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

56.8169.
Requests for proposals — Procedures for awarding built-to-suit leases.

In conducting the built-to-suit process, the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management, after consultation with the agency or agencies for whose use the space is sought, shall arrive at a request for proposals.

The request for proposals shall indicate the relative importance of evaluation factors.

A request for proposals may be amended at any time prior to the deadline for the submission of proposals.

In soliciting the interest of firms to carry out a built-to-suit, the department shall comply with the procedures established in this subsection.

The department shall provide adequate public notice of a request for proposals and notice of the materials that the department will provide to a firm to assist that firm in responding to a request for proposals. Those materials shall include, but not be limited to, the request for proposals and the proposal evaluation sheet to be used by the selection committee. The notice shall also set a time and date for a written response to the notice.

The Department for Facilities Management may use any means available to notify firms that a notice has been given.

To respond to a notice, a firm, or its representative, shall respond on or before the time and date designated in the notice. The response shall be in a form determined by the department and shall provide the firm’s name and address.

All written responses submitted on or before the time and date designated shall be opened or downloaded at the same time, publicly read or posted, and kept on file by the department. A firm which fails to meet the deadline shall be barred from the procurement process.

The department shall transmit to all firms that responded in time a request for proposals.

After the request for proposals have been transmitted, but before written proposals are submitted, the commissioner, and his staff, may hold any meetings, discussions, or negotiations that they deem appropriate with the firms.

The commissioner shall invite each firm to submit a written proposal, on a form created by the department, on or before the time and date set forth in the invitation. A form shall be provided to each firm.

A firm that does not submit a written proposal, on a form created by this department, on or before the deadline shall be barred from the procurement process.

Employees of the department and the members of the selection committee shall keep the written proposals confidential until the lease is awarded.

The commissioner shall designate a department employee to determine which firms have filed, in a timely fashion, both a response to the public notice and a written proposal on a form created by the department. The designated employee shall create a list of the firms which have done so and certify the list.

The department shall organize the selection committee’s first meeting. At that meeting, the selection committee shall:

Elect from its members a chairman and a vice chairman who shall hold their positions for the duration of the selection process;

Be provided with:

The certified list of firms;

The firms’ written proposals submitted in response to a request for proposals;

The request for proposals;

The notice of request for proposals;

The proposal evaluation sheets; and

A notice from the commissioner informing the committee that the selection process is governed by KRS

56.800

to

56.823

and

56.990

; and

Discuss the future conduct of its affairs.

The selection committee shall meet to:

Evaluate the materials with which it has been provided;

Select, but not rank, the three (3) most qualified firms, based upon the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals; and

Notify the department of the three (3) finalists.

The department shall notify each firm which responded to the request for proposals, informing the firm of:

The three (3) finalists; and

The rest of the procedure that will be followed in the awarding of the built-to-suit lease.

The selection committee shall interview the three (3) finalists, preferably on the same day. The finalists shall be interviewed one (1) at a time, and each interview shall be attended only by representatives of the finalist and members of the selection committee. Members of the selection committee shall keep confidential the substance of an interview.

The selection committee shall meet to:

Rank the three (3) finalists based on the weighted evaluation factors in the request for proposals; and

Forward the ranking to the department.

The commissioner shall:

Award the built-to-suit lease to the top ranked finalist; or

Request best-and-final offers.

The commissioner shall request best-and-final offers only of the three (3) finalists. The commissioner’s written request shall include his reason for requesting best-and-final offers, and shall state a time and date by which all best-and-final offers will have to be received. A firm that does not submit a best-and-final offer by the deadline shall not be awarded the built-to-suit lease.

Employees of the department and the members of the selection committee shall keep the best-and-final offers confidential until the lease is awarded.

The selection committee shall meet to assess all the materials with which it was provided pursuant to subsection (11)(b) of this section, as well as the request for best-and-final offers and best-and-final offers. The committee shall rank the best-and-final offers of the three (3) finalists based on the weighted evaluation factors in the request for proposals. If the committee determines that the top ranked best-and-final offer is adequate, the committee shall forward the name of the firm that submitted the top ranked best-and-final offer to the department. If the committee determines that the top ranked firm’s best-and-final offer is inadequate, the process shall end.

The commissioner shall award the built-to-suit lease to the firm chosen by the selection committee.

After the best firm has been selected, the department shall notify the finalists, informing them of:

Which firm has been selected for the proposed lease; and

The rest of the procedure that will be followed in the awarding of the lease.

KRS

61.878

shall govern the procurement process set out in this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 120, § 30, effective July 15, 1998; 2018 ch. 176, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

56.8171.
Certification by selection committee members — Auditor’s report to Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.

After the department has awarded the proposed built-to-suit lease to a firm, but before the lease is submitted to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee for review, the commissioner shall supply a copy of the proposed lease to each member of the selection committee.

The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner of the department, and each voting member of the selection committee shall sign separate certificates, devised by the department, which shall provide the signatory with the option of certifying that, to the best of his knowledge, he is either aware or unaware of circumstances which may constitute a willful violation of KRS

56.800

to

56.823

which has arisen in the procurement process.

The representative of the Auditor of Public Accounts shall prepare and file a report with the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee certifying that the applicable procedural provisions of KRS

56.800

to

56.823

were met.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

56.8173.
Firm not to be considered when committee member or family member employed by or has interest in that firm.

A selection committee shall not consider a firm for a built-to-suit lease when a member of the committee, his spouse, either of his parents, or any of his children is employed by that firm, or has a financial interest in that firm.

For a period of one (1) year after a person ends his service on a selection committee, the Commonwealth shall not consider a firm for a built-to-suit lease when the person, his spouse, either of his parents, or any of his children is employed by that firm or has a financial interest in that firm.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

56.8175.
Built-to-suit involving construction on private property — Option to purchase.

When a built-to-suit lease is awarded to a firm that owns the land upon which the building shall be built, the Commonwealth shall be granted an option to purchase the leased buildings, land, and any appurtenant facilities. The option price to be paid shall not exceed its fair market value as of the time the option is exercised as determined by a competent and qualified real estate appraiser, selected by mutual agreement of the parties, employing the reproduction cost new or other accepted appraisal techniques; provided, however, that in no event shall the option price be less than a sum equal to the remaining balance of any mortgage lien encumbering the property and securing the repayment of moneys advanced to the owner for the original construction of the building, plus an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of such mortgage balance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 8, effective July 14, 1992.

56.8177.
Execution of built-to-suit agreements — Recording of agreements.

All built-to-suit lease agreements shall be reviewed by the Office of Financial Management within the Office of the Controller prior to execution on behalf of the Commonwealth by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet or on behalf of an institution in accordance with KRS

164A.630

, and approved for form and legality by the Attorney General or an assistant attorney general, before they shall be binding against the Commonwealth. All the leases shall be lodged for record and recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the leased property is located.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 2003, ch. 98, § 15, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 85, § 82, effective June 20, 2005.

56.8179.
Building and construction code requirements.

A building constructed and leased to the Commonwealth under a built-to-suit lease agreement shall be constructed:

In accordance with all applicable state and national safety, building, and construction code requirements; and

To last, at a minimum, for a period of thirty (30) years.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 11, effective July 14, 1992.

56.818.
Term of built-to-suit leases — Option to purchase by Commonwealth — Recording. [Repealed.]

56.8181.
Collusion among lease proposers prohibited.

Any agreement or collusion among lease proposers or prospective lease proposers which restrains, tends to restrain, or is reasonably calculated to restrain competition by agreement to propose a lease with certain terms, or to refrain from proposing a lease with certain terms or otherwise, is prohibited.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 54, § 12, effective July 14, 1992.

56.819.
Procedure upon change in ownership of leased premises.

When there is a change in ownership in leased premises, the new owner shall furnish the Division of Real Properties, within the Department for Facilities and Support Services, with a copy of the deed or other instrument of conveyance by which the new owner acquired title to the property or the right to payment under the lease and other evidence in support of his claim to the payment of rent under the lease the Division of Real Properties may request. The Commonwealth shall change its records and redirect its rent payments accordingly.

When the agency occupying leased premises or the Finance and Administration Cabinet receives information that a change in ownership has occurred, payments of rent shall be suspended until the Division of Real Properties learns the ownership of the premises and determines who is entitled to the rent.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 2005, ch. 85, § 83, effective June 20, 2005.

56.820.
Construction on state-owned land under built-to-suit lease agreements — Leases without conveyance of title — Buildings located in Fayette County.

This section shall apply when the built-to-suit process involves the construction of a building on state-owned land.

Upon the execution of a lease awarded under this section, the Commonwealth shall convey to the individual or firm to whom such lease has been awarded, in fee simple with covenant of general warranty of title, the real estate upon which the building is to be constructed under this lease. The lease shall provide for an initial lease term commencing on the date the building is accepted for occupancy by the Commonwealth, but not later than thirty (30) days after the owner’s architect has certified that construction of the building has been completed, and ending June 30 of the second year of the then current fiscal biennium of the Commonwealth, with an option in the Commonwealth, as lessee, to extend the term of the lease for a term of two (2) years from the expiration of the original term of the lease and for two (2) years from the expiration of each extended term of the lease, until the original term of the lease has been extended for a total number of years to be agreed upon by the parties at a rental which, if paid for the original term and for each of the full number of years for which the term of the lease may be extended, will amortize the total cost of the erection of the building and appurtenances. The rent shall be paid at such times as the parties to the lease agreed upon. The lease shall provide that the lessee may, at the expiration of the original or any extended term, purchase the leased premises at a stated price, which shall be the balance of the total cost of erection of the building and appurtenances not amortized by the payments of rent previously made by the lessee. The lease shall provide that in the event of the exercise of the option to purchase the leased premises or in the event the lease has been extended for the full number of years which it is agreed the same may be extended, and all rents and payments provided for in the lease have been made, the lessor shall convey the premises to the lessee in fee simple with covenant of general warranty of title. The lease may provide that the lessee shall, as additional rent for the leased premises, pay all taxes assessed against the leased premises, and the cost of insuring the building erected thereon against loss or damage by fire and windstorm in such sum as may be agreed by the parties thereto.

For buildings located in Fayette County, the commissioner of the Department for Facilities Management on behalf of the Department for Military Affairs may award a built-to-suit lease for built-to-suit projects without the conveyance of title required in subsection (2) of this section. Any lease agreement under this subsection shall be awarded in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 45A. The provisions of KRS

56.8163

,

56.8165

,

56.8167

,

56.8169

,

56.8171

, and

56.8173

shall not apply to built-to-suit leases awarded under this subsection. Any lease agreement established under this subsection shall provide that title to all improvements shall vest in the Commonwealth upon completion of the term of the lease.

For buildings located in Fayette County procured pursuant to this section and leased from the Commonwealth by an agency of the federal government, the following provisions shall apply:

Notwithstanding KRS 56.813(2) to the contrary, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, on behalf of the Department of Military Affairs, may approve modifications to existing buildings if the source of the payments by the Department of Military Affairs for the improvements are made through an agreement with an agency of the United States government, or through an increase in the term of the lease, provided that the improvements are procured by the Department of Military Affairs pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter 45A; and

Any lease modification approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet pursuant to this subsection shall be reported by the cabinet to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to an appropriate legislative committee within thirty (30) days of the execution of the lease modification.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 231, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 54, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 2013, ch. 32, § 158, effective March 19, 2013; 2014, ch. 15, § 2, effective April 2, 2014.

56.821.
Lease records are public records.

Records relating to leases shall be a matter of public record, except as otherwise provided by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

56.822.
Limited judicial review.

Judicial review of the action of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and its secretary and the Department for Facilities Management and its commissioner in the award, or modification, of a lease pursuant to KRS

43.050

,

48.111

, and

56.800

to

56.823

shall be limited to determining whether a lease or modification to a lease was procured by fraud or was awarded arbitrarily or capriciously.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 12, effective July 13, 1990; 2009, ch. 78, § 47, effective June 25, 2009.

56.823.
Reports on leases, exercise of options to purchase, completion of lease-purchase agreements, and lease modifications to Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall report information on leases and lease modifications awarded pursuant to KRS

43.050

,

48.111

, and

56.800

to

56.823

to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee as required by this section.

Any lease awarded pursuant to KRS

56.803

, including all lease renewals except automatic renewals permitted under KRS 56.806(1), for which the annual rental cost will exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after a proposed lease is arrived at but before execution. The report shall include:

The name of the agency that will occupy the premises;

The name of the lessor;

The terms of the lease;

The reason for the lease;

A copy of the writing required by KRS

56.803

(17);

A statement as to whether the Finance and Administration Cabinet complied with the requirements established in KRS

43.050

,

48.111

, and

56.800

to

56.823

. If the cabinet has not complied with any requirement, the cabinet shall explain why;

An explanation of why the Finance and Administration Cabinet chose this lessor over his competition; and

A cost comparison between the cost per square foot of the leased space and the average cost per square foot of comparable space the state leases in the same county. If there are factors which make the comparison misleading, the cabinet shall inform the committee of these factors.

Any lease that incorporates a lease-purchase pursuant to KRS 56.806(5) shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after a proposed lease is arrived at but before execution.

If a lease is awarded pursuant to KRS

56.803

, the report shall include the:

Fair market value of the property as of the time the lessor and the Commonwealth entered into the lease;

Name and qualifications of each of the two (2) real estate appraisers who determined the fair market value;

Appraisal technique each appraiser employed; and

Information required by subsection (2) of this section.

Except as provided in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, if a lease is awarded pursuant to KRS 56.805(2), the report shall include the:

Fair market value of the property at the time the lessor and the Commonwealth entered into the lease;

Name and qualifications of each of the two (2) real estate appraisers who determined the fair market value;

Appraisal technique each appraiser employed;

Information required by paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (g), and (h) of subsection (2) of this section; and

Procedure the department followed to obtain the lease.

If the federal government is the lessor, the report shall include the substance of the lease-purchase.

Any lease awarded pursuant to KRS 56.805(2), including all lease renewals except automatic renewals permitted under KRS 56.806(1), for which the annual rental cost will exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after a proposed lease is arrived at but before execution. The report shall state the information required by paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (g), and (h) of subsection (2) of this section and the procedure the department followed to obtain the lease. The report shall also include a copy of the writing required by KRS 56.805(2).

Any lease awarded as the result of an emergency described at KRS 56.805(3) shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee within thirty (30) days after execution. The report shall include a copy of the certificate or the certificate and the Governor’s authorization, as appropriate, kept on file pursuant to KRS 56.805(4) and shall further state:

The information required by paragraphs (a), (b), (f), (g), and (h) of subsection (2) of this section;

The terms of lease before and after the emergency; and

The procedure the department followed after the emergency to obtain a lease.

Any built-to-suit lease awarded pursuant to KRS

56.8169

shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after a proposed lease is arrived at but before execution. The report shall state the information required by paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (g), and (h) of subsection (2) of this section. The report shall also include:

The written finding and Governor’s approval required by KRS

56.8161

;

The selection committee’s ranking of firms required by KRS

56.8169

(15)(a);

The written reason for requesting best-and-final offers, if best-and-final offers are requested, made pursuant to KRS 56.8169(16)(b);

The selection committee’s selection of the best best-and-final offer, if best-and-final offers are requested, made pursuant to KRS 56.8169(16)(d);

The certificates signed pursuant to KRS 56.8171(2); and

The report prepared by the employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts pursuant to KRS 56.8171(3).

If the Finance and Administration Cabinet decides to exercise an option to purchase pursuant to KRS 56.806(4), the cabinet shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after the decision is reached but before the purchase occurs.

The report shall include the:

Fair market value of the property;

Option price;

Name and qualifications of each of the two (2) real estate appraisers who set the fair market value;

Appraisal technique each appraiser employed; and

Rent paid by the Commonwealth prior to the exercise of the option.

When, pursuant to KRS 56.806(5)(a), the Finance and Administration Cabinet attempts to complete a lease-purchase through lease payments totally amortizing the fair market value of the leased property as of the time the lessor and the Commonwealth entered into the lease, the cabinet shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee no more than ninety (90) days before the final lease payment. The report shall include the:

Fair market value of the property at the time the lessor and the Commonwealth entered into the lease;

Name and qualifications of each of the two (2) real estate appraisers who set the fair market value;

Appraisal technique each appraiser employed; and

Rent paid by the Commonwealth toward the purchase.

When, pursuant to KRS 56.806(5)(b), the Finance and Administration Cabinet attempts to complete a lease-purchase, the cabinet shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee no more than ninety (90) days before the final lease payment. The report shall include the terms of the lease purchase.

When, pursuant to KRS 56.806(5), the Finance and Administration Cabinet decides to attempt to complete a lease-purchase prior to the total amortization, through lease payments, of the fair market value of the leased property as of the time the lessor and the Commonwealth entered into the lease, the cabinet shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after the decision is reached but before the purchase occurs. The report shall state the information required by paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection (8) of this section as appropriate. The report shall also include the sum of money that must be paid in addition to rent paid, in order to complete the purchase.

If the Finance and Administration Cabinet, pursuant to KRS 56.806(5), includes in a lease the lease-purchase of the leased property and thereafter becomes aware that a purchase will not be achieved, within thirty (30) days after the cabinet becomes aware, it shall notify the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee of the circumstances preventing the purchase.

Except in the case of an emergency as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, any modification to an existing lease, made pursuant to KRS

56.813

, that is less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee within thirty (30) days after execution, and any modification to an existing lease, made pursuant to KRS

56.813

, that is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee before execution. In either case, the report shall consist of:

The terms of the lease before and after modification;

The reason for the modification;

The name of the lessor;

Any comments received from the public pursuant to KRS 56.813(4); and

A statement as to whether the Finance and Administration Cabinet complied with the requirements in KRS 56.813. If the cabinet has not complied with any requirement, the cabinet shall explain why.

Any modification to an existing lease which is required because of an emergency as described at KRS 56.805(3) shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee within thirty (30) days after execution. The report shall include a copy of the certificate or the certificate and the Governor’s authorization, as appropriate, kept on file pursuant to KRS 56.805(4) and shall further state:

The terms of the lease before and after modification;

The name of the lessor;

Any comments received from the public pursuant to KRS 56.813(4); and

A statement that the Finance and Administration Cabinet complied with the requirements in KRS 56.805(3) and (4) and in KRS 56.813. If the cabinet has not complied with any requirement, the cabinet shall explain why.

Before beginning work on any improvements, renovations, or refitting of a leased building under the provisions of KRS 56.813(2)(d), the cabinet shall report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee:

A description of the project;

Identification of the agency or agencies for which the improvements, renovations, or refitting are being performed;

An estimate of the total cost of the project;

The source of funds for the project; and

All the information required by KRS

45.793

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 512, § 13, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 54, § 13, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 339, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 44, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 539, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 48, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 103, § 2, effective March 21, 2017.

56.830.
Negotiation, renewal and modification of leases — Terms — Calculation of rent — Prohibition of permanent improvements — Disclosure of ownership. [Repealed.]

56.832.
Lease by Commonwealth of real property in foreign jurisdiction.

The term “foreign jurisdiction” for the purpose of this section means states other than Kentucky, a territory of the United States, or a foreign country.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations relating to the lease of real property in a foreign jurisdiction.

When an agency determines it has a need to lease office space in a foreign jurisdiction, the agency shall submit a request in writing to the Department for Facilities and Support Services within the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Department for Facilities and Support Services shall review the space request and draw up general requirement specifications. The general requirement specifications shall be kept on file by the department.

If the Department for Facilities and Support Services determines that it is not feasible to lease the space through competitive sealed bid, the Department for Facilities and Support Services may, under Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations, acquire leased space through noncompetitive negotiation.

If competitive sealed bid is determined to be unfeasible, the commissioner of the Department for Facilities and Support Services shall put in writing the justification for his determination prior to award of the lease. This writing shall be kept on file by the department.

Any lease awarded under this section shall include a thirty (30) day cancellation notice that will allow the Commonwealth the right to cancel the lease upon written notice within thirty (30) days.

Any lease proposed to be awarded under this section, including all lease renewals for which the annual rental cost will exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee after drafting of the lease is completed but before execution. The report shall include:

The name of the agency that will occupy the premises;

The name of the lessor;

The purpose and justification for the lease;

The terms of the lease;

An explanation of why the Finance and Administration Cabinet chose this lessor; and

A survey and cost comparison of similar rental properties within the area.

Within thirty (30) days after the report required in subsection (7) of this section has been submitted to the committee, the committee shall conduct its review and decide whether to approve or disapprove the proposed lease authorization. If the committee disapproves a proposed lease authorization, the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall:

Revise the proposed lease authorization to comply with the objection of the committee;

Cancel the proposed lease authorization; or

Determine to proceed with the proposed lease authorization disapproved by the committee.

The decision made by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet under subsection (8) of this section shall be communicated to the committee in writing within thirty (30) days of the committee’s disapproval.

Except when another lease term is approved by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the terms of the lease entered into may provide for an initial lease term beginning on a date stated and ending on June 30 in each year in which the General Assembly has convened in an even-numbered-year regular session and appropriated funds for the operation of the state government during the next ensuing biennium. The lease may grant the state successive options for the automatic renewal of the lease upon the same terms and conditions for additional renewal periods of twenty-four (24) months each, not to exceed three (3) automatic renewal periods. Any lease containing a provision for the automatic renewal of the lease after the expiration of the initial lease term shall also provide that the state may, upon written notice given to the lessor on or before April 15 of the year in which the initial or any automatic renewal term expires, elect not to exercise its option for the automatic renewal of the lease term. Subject to the agreement of the lessor, a lease in which the final automatic renewal period has expired, or will expire as of the end of the then current term, may be renewed upon the same terms and conditions, provisions of KRS

56.803

to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 153, § 1, effective July 15, 2008.